Illinois, session 104th, SB2094.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fiscal Note Act is amended by changing 5Section 3 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 50/3)  (from Ch. 63, par. 42.33)7    Sec. 3. Any Whenever the sponsor of any measure is of the 8opinion that no fiscal note is necessary, any member of either 9house may thereafter request that a note be obtained, and in 10such case, the note shall be prepared. No rule of either house 11may authorize or require a note request that is made under this 12Act to be deemed inapplicable the matter shall be decided by 13majority vote of those present and voting in the house of which 14he is a member.15(Source: Laws 1965, p. 858.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.